Maryland, session 2026, SB0636.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
12–102.
This title applies only in Baltimore City.
12–2003.
(a) (1) Except as provided in § 12–2005 of this subtitle, a holder of a Class A
beer and light wine license may sell beer and light wine:
(i) on Monday through Saturday:
1. from 9 a.m. to 10 p.m. in the area specified in the Park
Heights Master Plan adopted by the City in 2006; and
– 1 –

Ch. 813 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
2. from 6 a.m. to midnight in all other locations in the City;
and
(ii) on the Sundays that fall between Thanksgiving Day and New
Year’s Day, from 1 p.m. to 9 p.m., if[, on or before September 30 of that year,] the license
holder has paid a supplementary license fee of $120 for each Sunday the privilege is to be
exercised.
(2) In addition to the privileges specified under paragraph (1)(ii) of this
subsection, the license holder may sell beer and light wine for off–premises consumption on
two additional Sundays during the calendar year if the holder pays a license fee of $120 at
least 2 weeks before each time the privilege is exercised.
12–2004.
(a) (1) Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle, a holder of a Class A beer,
wine, and liquor license may sell beer, wine, and liquor:
(i) on Monday through Saturday:
1. from 9 a.m. to 10 p.m. in the area specified in the Park
Heights Master Plan adopted by the City in 2006;
2. from 9 a.m. to 10 p.m. in an area bounded as follows: from
the intersection of Belair Road and Anntana Avenue, southwest on Belair Road to the
intersection of Belair Road and Frankford Avenue, southeast on Frankford Avenue to the
intersection of Frankford Avenue and Sipple Avenue, west on Sipple Avenue to the
intersection of Sipple Avenue and Crenshaw Avenue, southeast on Crenshaw Avenue to
the intersection of Crenshaw Avenue and Goodnow Road, southeast on Goodnow Road to
the intersection of Goodnow Road and Sinclair Lane, northeast on Sinclair Lane to the
intersection of Sinclair Lane and Radecke Avenue, west on Radecke Avenue to the
intersection of Radecke Avenue and Anntana Avenue, then north on Anntana Avenue to
the intersection of Anntana Avenue and Belair Road; and
3. from 6 a.m. to midnight in all other locations in the City;
and
(ii) on the Sundays that fall between Thanksgiving Day and New
Year’s Day, from 1 p.m. to 9 p.m., if[, on or before September 30 of that year,] the license
holder has paid a supplementary license fee of $120 for each Sunday the privilege is to be
exercised.
(2) In addition to the privileges specified under paragraph (1)(ii) of this
subsection, the license holder may sell beer, wine, and liquor for off–premises consumption
on two additional Sundays during the calendar year if the holder pays a license fee of $120
at least 2 weeks before each time the privilege is exercised.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 813
12–2103.
(a) The Board shall immediately suspend without a hearing the renewal license
of a license holder that fails to present to the Board by [October 30] MARCH 30 annually
a certificate issued by the Director of Finance showing that all personal property taxes due
to the City or State are paid.
(b) The Board shall immediately reinstate a license suspended under this section
without a hearing on presentation of the required certificate.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 3 –